Hawaii statutes.
§268-16 Report. The director of
transportation shall prepare a report in writing of the nature and extent of
the director's activities under this chapter whenever the director deems it
necessary or appropriate. The report shall be delivered to each house of the
legislature. [L 1963, c 186, §15; Supp, §114-15; HRS §268-16; am L 1979, c 55,
§1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next